Hawaii statutes.
§414D-278 Change of registered agent of
foreign corporation. (a) A foreign corporation authorized to transact
business in this State may change its registered agent by complying with the
requirements of section 425R-7.

(b) If a registered agent changes its name,
its address, or its type or jurisdiction of organization, the agent shall
comply with the requirements of chapter 425R. [L 2001, c 105, pt of §1; am L
2002, c 130, §65; am L 2009, c 55, §25]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next